District of Columbia statutes.
47-392.22

General assistance in achieving financial stability and management efficiency.

In addition to any other actions described in §§ 47-392.01 through 47-392.24, the Authority may undertake cooperative efforts to assist the District government in achieving financial stability and management efficiency, including:

(1)

Assisting the District government in avoiding defaults, eliminating and liquidating deficits, maintaining sound budgetary practices, and avoiding interruptions in the delivery of services;

(2)

Assisting the District government in improving the delivery of municipal services, the training and effectiveness of personnel of the District government, and the efficiency of management and supervision; and

(3)

Making recommendations to the President for transmission to Congress on changes to this Act or other Federal laws, or other actions of the Federal Government, which would assist the District government in complying with an approved financial plan and budget under part B of this subchapter.

History

Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 140, Pub. L. 104-8, § 222
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-392.22.

References in Text

“This Act,” referred to in paragraph (3), is the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, approved April 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 97, Pub. L. 104-8.